Illinois, session 104th, SB1003.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-1)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975".9(Source: P.A. 79-1185.)